Utah statutes.
41-3-201.7.   Supplemental license for additional place of business
restrictions -- Exception.
(1)  Subject to the requirements of Subsection (2), a supplemental license for
an additional place of business issued pursuant to Subsection 41-3-201(6) may
only be issued to a dealer if the dealer is:
(a)  licensed in accordance with Section 41-3-202;
(b)  bonded in accordance with Section 41-3-205; and
(c)  in compliance with existing rules promulgated by the administrator of the
division under Section 41-3-105.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (2)(c) and (3), a supplemental
license for an additional place of business issued pursuant to Subsection
41-3-201(6) for a new motor vehicle dealer may not be issued for an additional
place of business that is beyond the geographic specifications outlined as the
area of responsibility in the dealer's franchise agreement.
(b)  A new motor vehicle dealer shall provide the administrator with a copy of
the portion of the new motor vehicle dealer's franchise agreement identifying
the dealer's area of responsibility before being issued a supplemental license
for an additional place of business.
(c)  The restrictions under Subsections (2)(a) and (b) do not apply to a new
motor vehicle dealer if the license for an additional place of business is
being issued for the sale of used motor vehicles.
(3)  The provisions of Subsection (2) do not apply if the additional place of
business is a trade show or exhibition if:
(a)  there are five or more dealers participating in the trade show or
exhibition; and
(b)  the trade show or exhibition takes place at a location other than the
principal place of business of one of the dealers participating in the trade
show or exhibition.
